Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 152, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 152. All persons are capable of committing crimes,
except those belonging to the following classes:
1. Children under the age of seven (7) years;
2. Children over the age of seven (7) years, but under the age
of fourteen (14) years, in the absence of proof that at the time of
committing the act or neglect charged against them, they knew its
wrongfulness;
3. Persons who are impaired by reason of an intellectual
disability upon proof that at the time of committing the act charged
against them they were incapable of knowing its wrongfulness;

Req. No. 14209 Page 1

4. Mentally ill persons, and all persons of unsound mind,
including persons temporarily or partially deprived of reason, upon
proof that at the time of committing the act charged against them
they were incapable of knowing its wrongfulness;
5. Persons who committed the act, or made the omission charged,
under an ignorance or mistake of fact which disproves any criminal
intent. But ignorance of the law does not excuse from punishment
for its violation;
6. Persons who committed the act charged without being
conscious thereof; and
7. Persons who committed the act, or make the omission charged,
while under involuntary subjection to the power of superiors.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14209 GRS 01/11/26









Req. No. 14209 Page 2